Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2117.02
License; renewal.

(1) No license as a Class A master electrician, Class B master electrician, Class B electrical contractor, Class B journeyman electrician, or installer shall be issued on or after September 9, 1993, but such licenses may be renewed as provided in this section.

(2) A person licensed as a Class A master electrician, a Class B master electrician, a Class B electrical contractor, a Class B journeyman electrician, an installer, or a special electrician on September 9, 1993, may renew such license on or after such date upon presentation of documentary evidence of successful completion of the requisite hours of continuing education courses under section 81-2117.01 and payment of the fee for renewal provided by section 81-2118.

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 17;

Laws 2003, LB 126, § 10.